Massachusetts, session 194th, H1148.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the general laws, as amended by chapter 47 of the acts of 
2017, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-  
Section 238. There shall be a commission on acupuncture and wellness within the 
department. The commission shall consist of: the commissioner of public health or the 
commissioner’s designee, who shall chair the commission; the commissioner of insurance or the 
commissioner’s designee; the director of MassHealth or the director’s designee; the director of 
the board of registration in medicine or the director’s designee; the senate chair of the joint 
committee on public health; the house chair of the joint committee on public health; a member 
representing a statewide organization of licensed acupuncturists; a member representing a 
statewide organization of medical acupuncturists; a member representing the Massachusetts 

of 5 11 Public Health Association; and 5 members to be selected by the Governor including: no fewer 
than 2 acupuncturists, licensed and practicing in the state of Massachusetts; a member 
representing one of the top five health insurance companies in Massachusetts according to 
market share, a member representing a health care consumer organization, and a member 
currently practicing as a licensed physician in Massachusetts.    
The commission on acupuncture and wellness shall make an investigation and 
comprehensive study of the potential for better integrated use of acupuncture services to expand 
access, reduce health care costs, and provide improved quality of care to Massachusetts 
residents. The commission shall:   
(1) Consider strategies to evaluate and implement effective integration of acupuncture 
services in health care delivery in Massachusetts with specific focus on interventions in pain 
management, substance abuse treatment, and wellness promotion.  
(2) Consider strategies to effectively integrate acupuncture treatment modalities into 
alternative payment models, including, but not limited to, accountable care organizations, 
workplace wellness programs and provider organizations established under chapter 224 of the 
acts of 2012.  
(3) Consider strategies regarding reimbursement of licensed acupuncturists via third party 
payors or otherwise to facilitate a stable and sustainable integration of acupuncture services into 
the broader system of health care delivery.   
The commission on acupuncture and wellness shall submit to the secretary of health and 
human services and the joint committee public health, six months after the effective date of this 

of 5 32 act and annually thereafter, a report that includes findings from the commission’s review along 
with recommendations and any suggested legislation to implement those recommendations.     
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2016 official 
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 47II, the following section:-   
Section 47JJ. (a) All individual or group accident and health insurance policies and health 
service contracts delivered, issued or renewed by an insurer or nonprofit health service 
corporation which provide benefits to individual subscribers and members within the 
commonwealth or to all group members having a principal place of employment within the 
commonwealth shall provide benefits for acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and 
treatment in the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse 
treatment, and nausea.    
SECTION 3. Said chapter 175 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 205 
the following section:-  
Section 205A. (a) The commissioner shall not approve a policy under section 205 that 
does not provide benefits for acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and treatment in 
the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and 
nausea.       
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2016 official 
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 8KK, the following section:-  
Section 8LL. (a) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an 
individual or group hospital service plan delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth shall 

of 5 53 provide as benefits to all individual subscribers and members within the commonwealth and to 
all group members having a principal place of employment within the commonwealth 
acupuncture and oriental medicine based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain 
management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.      
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2016 official 
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4KK, the following section:-  
Section 4LL. (a) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical 
service agreement delivered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth shall provide benefits to all 
individual subscribers and members within the commonwealth and to all group members having 
a principal place of employment within the commonwealth for acupuncture and oriental 
medicine based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain management, post-traumatic stress 
disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.      
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2016 official 
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4CC, the following section:-  
Section 4DD. (a) Any group health maintenance contract shall provide coverage for 
acupuncture and oriental medicine-based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain 
management, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.     
SECTION 7. Chapter 32A of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2016 official 
edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 17O, the following section:-  
Section 17P. The commission shall provide to an active or retired employee of the 
commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for acupuncture 

of 5 74 and oriental medicine-based diagnosis and treatment in the areas of pain management, post-
traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse treatment, and nausea.  
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no third-party 
payer of health care services shall differentiate reimbursement rates for acupuncture services by 
provider type. Only licensed acupuncturists or medical doctors shall be reimbursed for 
acupuncture services.